Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 9
MISCELLANEOUS POWERS

31-15-901. Miscellaneous powers.

The governing body of each municipality has the power:

To appropriate money in an amount not exceeding six-tenths of one mill on the valuation for assessment for the purpose of giving public concerts and entertainments by such municipality;

To appropriate moneys for the purpose of advertising or marketing the business, social, and educational advantages, the natural resources, and the scenic attractions of such municipality;

To aid and foster, by all lawful measures, associated charity organizations by appropriations and to grant the use of suitable rooms in the municipal buildings. No portion of any money so appropriated shall be given or loaned to any society, corporation, association, or institution that may be wholly or in part under sectarian or denominational control.

To conduct or participate in forest health projects, as defined in section 37-95-103 (4.9), within and outside the municipal boundaries that benefit municipal property or improvements, including water collection and supply facilities, or reduce the risk of wildfire within the municipality and watersheds within which the municipality collects, transports, or stores its water supply.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1122, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 93:

(1)(d) added, p. 347, § 5, effective April 12.

L. 98:

(1)(c) amended, p. 334, § 1, effective April 17; (1)(d) repealed, p. 826, § 42, effective August 5.

L. 2008:

(1)(b) amended, p. 5, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

(1)(d) RC&RE, (HB 21-1008), ch. 159, p. 906, § 5, effective May 20.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 31-12-101 and 31-15-201 as they existed prior to 1975.

31-15-902. Deferred compensation plans.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a municipality and its employees may participate in the deferred compensation plan of the international city management association retirement corporation, a nonprofit corporation approved by the United States internal revenue service for establishing a retirement plan. No statute restricting the deposit or investment of municipal money shall be applicable to moneys in such plan.

In addition to the authority granted in subsection (1) of this section, any municipality may otherwise provide a deferred compensation plan for its employees and may, by contract, agree with an employee to defer all or a part of the employee's salary or wages. Funds of such plan may be used to purchase fixed or variable annuities from any life insurance company duly authorized to do an insurance and annuity business in this state or may otherwise be deposited and invested in accordance with any statute applicable to the deposit or investment of municipal money.

If a municipality participates in or establishes a deferred compensation plan for its employees pursuant to this section and if such plan is in addition to any other pension or retirement plan provided by the municipality, the amount of an employee's deferred compensation shall continue to be counted as part of his total salary or wages for the purpose of computing any other pension or retirement contributions or benefits which are based on total salary or wages.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire section added, p. 1464, § 1, effective May 24.

31-15-903. Legislative declaration - municipalities - new business facilities - expanded or existing business facilities - incentives - limitations - authority to exceed revenue-raising limitation.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that the health, safety, and welfare of the people of this state are dependent upon the attraction of new private enterprise as well as the retention and expansion of existing private enterprise; that incentives are often necessary in order to attract private enterprise; and that providing such incentives stimulates economic development in the state and results in the creation and maintenance of new jobs.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, any municipality may negotiate for an incentive payment or credit with any taxpayer who establishes a business facility, as defined in section 39-30-105.1 (6)(b), in the municipality. In no instance may any negotiation result in an annual incentive payment or credit that is greater than the amount of taxes levied by the municipality upon the taxable personal property located at or within the business facility and used in connection with the operation of the business facility for the current property tax year. The term of any agreement made prior to August 6, 2014, pursuant to the provisions of this subsection (1) may not exceed ten years, including the term of any original agreement being renewed. The term of any agreement made on or after August 6, 2014, pursuant to this subsection (1) may not exceed thirty-five years, which does not include the term of any prior agreement.

(1.5) (a) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, a municipality may negotiate an incentive payment or credit for a taxpayer that has an existing business facility located in the municipality if, based on verifiable documentation, the municipality is satisfied that there is a substantial risk that the taxpayer will relocate the facility out of state.

The documentation required pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (1.5) must include information that the taxpayer could reasonably and efficiently relocate the facility out of state and that at least one other state is being considered for the relocation. In order to be eligible for a payment or credit under this subsection (1.5), a taxpayer must identify the specific reasons why the taxpayer is considering leaving the state.

A municipality shall not give an annual incentive payment or credit under this subsection (1.5) that is greater than the amount of the taxes levied by the municipality upon the taxable personal property located at or within the existing business facility and used in connection with the operation of the existing business facility for the current property tax year. The term of an agreement made prior to August 6, 2014, pursuant to this subsection (1.5) shall not exceed ten years, and this limit includes any renewals of the original agreement. The term of an agreement made on or after August 6, 2014, pursuant to this subsection (1.5) shall not exceed thirty-five years, and this limit does not include the term of any prior agreement. A municipality shall not give an annual incentive payment or credit under this subsection (1.5), unless the governing body of the municipality approves the payment or credit at a public hearing.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, any municipality may negotiate for an incentive payment or credit with any taxpayer who expands a facility, as defined in section 39-30-105.1 (6)(e), the expansion of which authorizes a taxpayer to claim a credit described in section 39-30-105.1, and that is located in the municipality. In no instance may any negotiation result in an annual incentive payment or credit that is greater than the amount of the taxes levied by the municipality upon the taxable personal property directly attributable to the expansion, located at or within the expanded facility, and used in connection with the operation of the expanded facility for the current property tax year. The term of any agreement made prior to August 6, 2014, pursuant to the provisions of this subsection (2) may not exceed ten years, including the term of any original agreement being renewed. The term of any agreement made on or after August 6, 2014, pursuant to this subsection (2) may not exceed thirty-five years, which does not include the term of any prior agreement.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 94, p. 2834, § 4, effective January 1, 1995.)

Any municipality that negotiates any agreement pursuant to the provisions of this section shall inform any county in which a new business facility would be located, or an existing or expanded business facility is located, whichever is applicable, of such negotiations.

Any municipality may adjust the amount of its tax levy authorized pursuant to the provisions of section 29-1-301, C.R.S., or pursuant to a municipal home rule charter, whichever is applicable, by an additional amount which does not exceed the total amount of annual incentive payments or credits made by such municipality in accordance with any agreements negotiated pursuant to the provisions of this section or section 39-30-107.5, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire section added, p. 1455, § 2, effective April 24.

L. 91:

(1) amended and (5) added, p. 724, § 2, effective May 24.

L. 94:

(1)(b), (2), (3), and (5) amended, p. 2834, § 4, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2002:

(1)(b) and (2) amended, p. 1120, § 4, effective June 3.

L. 2007:

(1)(b) and (2) amended, p. 350, § 5, effective August 3.

L. 2012:

(1)(b) and (2) amended, (HB 12-1029), ch. 61, p. 220, § 4, effective August 8.

L. 2013:

(1.5) added and (4) amended, (HB 13-1206), ch. 374, p. 2204, § 2, effective August 7.

L. 2014:

(1)(b), (1.5)(c), and (2) amended, (SB 14-183), ch. 196, p. 721, § 2, effective August 6.

L. 2020:

(1)(b) and (2) amended, (HB 20-1166), ch. 103, p. 395, § 3, effective April 1.

Cross references:

(1) For similar provisions for school districts and counties, see §§ 22-32-110 and 30-11-123.

(2) In 2012, subsections (1)(b) and (2) were amended by the "Save Colorado Jobs Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 61, Session Laws of Colorado 2012.

31-15-904. Third-party food delivery service fee restrictions - definitions.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Declared public health disaster emergency" means the declared public health disaster emergency to address the COVID-19 pandemic of 2020, as declared by the governor by executive order.

"Retail food establishment" means a retail food establishment, as defined in section 25-4-1602 (14), that pays an annual license fee as required by section 25-4-1607 (1)(a), (1.5)(a)(I), or (1.5)(b)(I). "Retail food establishment" does not include grocery stores or convenience stores.

"Third-party food delivery service" means any person, company, website, mobile application, or other internet service that offers or arranges for the sale and the same-day delivery or same-day pickup of prepared food or beverages from a retail food establishment.

During a declared public health disaster emergency, the governing body of each municipality may adopt, administer, and enforce ordinances and resolutions that:

Limit the amount of the fee that a third-party food delivery service may charge to a retail food establishment, excluding fees related to credit card processing, within the municipality where indoor dining is prohibited and until indoor dining is again permitted in the municipality at a capacity of at least fifty percent or below at the discretion of the municipality;

Restrict the ability of a third-party food delivery service to reduce the compensation rate paid to a delivery service driver or withhold gratuities or tips to a retail food establishment, its staff, or any delivery service driver to offset revenue reductions resulting from any ordinance or resolution enacted pursuant to subsection (2)(a) of this section;

Require a third-party food delivery service to disclose to a consumer using the third-party food delivery service to make a purchase from a retail food establishment any commission, fee, or other monetary payment charged by the third-party food delivery service to the retail food establishment for a purchase from the retail food establishment; and

Restrict a third-party food delivery service's ability to perform a service for a retail food establishment without the retail food establishment's consent.

A governing body of a municipality that adopts an ordinance or resolution pursuant to subsection (2) of this section is immune from liability for all claims for injury resulting from any economic damage that a party may incur due to the ordinance or resolution except to the extent that the ordinance or resolution is held by a court of competent jurisdiction to constitute a taking of private property in violation of the United States or state constitution.

Source:

L. 2020, 1st Ex. Sess.:

Entire section added, (HB 20B-1005), ch. 4, p. 29, § 3, effective December 7.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 20B-1005, see section 1 of chapter 4, Session Laws of Colorado 2020, First Extraordinary Session.